Louisiana, session 2026, SB87.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:46.2(C)(1) and 46.3(B) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§46.2. Human trafficking
* * *
C. For purposes of this Section:
(1) "Commercial sexual activity" means any sexual or lewd or lascivious act
performed or conducted when anything of value has been given, promised, or
received by any person, directly or indirectly, including the production of or
transmission of child sexual abuse materials or pornography.
* * *
§46.3. Trafficking of children for sexual purposes
* * *
B. For purposes of this Section, "commercial sexual activity" means any
sexual or lewd or lascivious act performed or conducted upon the person or in the
presence of any child when any thing anything of value has been given, promised,
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 87 ENROLLED
or received by any person, directly or indirectly, including the production or
transmission of child sexual abuse materials or pornography.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.